Utah statutes.
32A-3-101.   Commission's power to establish package agencies --
Limitations.
(1) (a)  The commission may, when it considers necessary, create a package
agency by entering into a contractual relationship with a person to sell
liquor in sealed packages from premises other than those owned or leased by
the state.
(b)  The commission shall authorize a person to operate a package agency by
issuing a certificate from the commission that designates the person in charge
of the agency as a "package agent" as defined under Section 32A-1-105.
(2) (a)  Subject to this Subsection (2), the total number of package agencies
may not at any time aggregate more than that number determined by dividing the
population of the state by 18,000.
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (2)(a), population shall be determined by:
(i)  the most recent United States decennial or special census; or
(ii) another population determination made by the United States or state
governments.
(c) (i)  The commission may establish seasonal package agencies established in
areas the commission considers necessary.
(ii)  A seasonal package agency shall be for a period of six consecutive
months.
(iii) A package agency established for operation during a summer time period
is known as a "Seasonal A" package agency.  The period of operation for a
"Seasonal A" agency shall:
(A)  begin on May 1; and
(B)  end on October 31.
(iv) A package agency established for operation during a winter time period is
known as a "Seasonal B" package agency.  The period of operation for a
"Seasonal B" agency shall:
(A)  begin on November 1; and
(B)  end on April 30.
(v)  In determining the number of package agencies that the commission may
establish under this section:
(A)  a seasonal package agency is counted as 1/2 of one package agency; and
(B)  each "Seasonal A" agency shall be paired with a "Seasonal B" agency.
(d) (i)  If the location, design, and construction of a hotel may require more
than one package agency sales location to serve the public convenience, the
commission may authorize a single package agent to sell liquor at as many as
three locations within the hotel under one package agency if:
(A)  the hotel has a minimum of 150 guest rooms; and
(B)  all locations under the agency are:
(I)  within the same hotel facility; and
(II)  on premises that are managed or operated and owned or leased by the
package agent.
(ii) A facility other than a hotel may not have more than one sales location
under a single package agency.
(3) (a) Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), (c), or (d), the premises of
a package agency may not be established:
(i)  within 600 feet of a community location, as measured by the method
described in Subsection (3)(e); or
(ii)  within 200 feet of a community location, measured in a straight line
from the nearest entrance of the proposed package agency to the nearest
property boundary of the community location.
(b)  With respect to the establishment of a package agency, the commission may
authorize a variance to reduce the proximity requirement of Subsection
(3)(a)(i) if:
(i)  the local authority grants its written consent to the variance;
(ii)  the commission finds that alternative locations for establishing a
package agency in the community are limited;
(iii)  a public hearing is held in the city, town, or county, and where
practical in the neighborhood concerned;
(iv)  after giving full consideration to all of the attending circumstances
and the policies stated in Subsections 32A-1-104(3) and (4), the commission
determines that establishing the package agency would not be detrimental to
the public health, peace, safety, and welfare of the community; and
(v) (A)  the community location governing authority gives its written consent
to the variance; or
(B)  when written consent is not given by the community location governing
authority, the commission finds that the applicant has established that:
(I)  there is substantial unmet public demand to consume alcohol within the
geographic boundary of the local authority in which the package agency is to
be located;
(II)  there is no reasonably viable alternative for satisfying substantial
unmet demand described in Subsection (3)(b)(v)(B)(I) other than through the
establishment of a package agency; and
(III)  there is no reasonably viable alternative location within the
geographic boundary of the local authority in which the package agency is to
be located for establishing a package agency to satisfy the unmet demand
described in Subsection (3)(b)(v)(B)(I).
(c)  With respect to the establishment of a package agency, the commission may
authorize a variance that reduces the proximity requirement of Subsection
(3)(a)(ii) if:
(i)  the community location at issue is:
(A)  a public library; or
(B)  a public park;
(ii)  the local authority grants its written consent to the variance;
(iii)  the commission finds that alternative locations for establishing a
package agency in the community are limited;
(iv)  a public hearing is held in the city, town, or county, and where
practical in the neighborhood concerned;
(v)  after giving full consideration to all of the attending circumstances and
the policies stated in Subsections 32A-1-104(3) and (4), the commission
determines that establishing the package agency would not be detrimental to
the public health, peace, safety, and welfare of the community; and
(vi) (A)  the community location governing authority gives its written consent
to the variance; or
(B)  when written consent is not given by the community location governing
authority, the commission finds that the applicant has established that:
(I)  there is substantial unmet public demand to consume alcohol within the
geographic boundary of the local authority in which the package agency is to
be located;
(II)  there is no reasonably viable alternative for satisfying substantial
unmet demand described in Subsection (3)(c)(vi)(B)(I) other than through the
establishment of a package agency; and
(III)  there is no reasonably viable alternative location within the
geographic boundary of the local authority in which the package agency is to
be located for establishing a package agency to satisfy the unmet demand
described in Subsection (3)(c)(vi)(B)(I).
(d)  With respect to the premises of a package agency issued by the commission
that undergoes a change of ownership, the commission may waive or vary the
proximity requirements of Subsection (3)(a) in considering whether to grant a
package agency to the new owner of the premises if:
(i) (A)  the premises previously received a variance reducing the proximity
requirement of Subsection (3)(a)(i); or
(B)  the premises received a variance reducing the proximity requirement of
Subsection (3)(a)(ii) on or before May 4, 2008; or
(ii)  a variance from proximity requirements was otherwise allowed under this
title.
(e)  The 600 foot limitation described in Subsection (3)(a)(i) is measured
from the nearest entrance of the package agency by following the shortest
route of ordinary pedestrian travel to the property boundary of the community
location.
(4) (a)  Nothing in this section prevents the commission from considering the
proximity of any educational, religious, and recreational facility, or any
other relevant factor in reaching a decision on a proposed location.
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (4)(a), "educational facility" includes:
(i)  a nursery school;
(ii)  an infant day care center; and
(iii)  a trade and technical school.
(5) (a)  The package agent, under the direction of the department, is
responsible for implementing and enforcing this title and the rules adopted
under this title to the extent they relate to the conduct of the package
agency and its sale of liquor.
(b)  A package agent may not be, or construed to be, a state employee nor be
otherwise entitled to any benefits of employment from the state.
(c)  A package agent, when selling liquor from a package agency, is considered
an agent of the state only to the extent specifically expressed in the package
agency agreement.
(6)  The commission may prescribe by policy, directive, or rule, consistent
with this title, general operational requirements of all package agencies
relating to:
(a)  physical facilities;
(b)  conditions of operation;
(c)  hours of operation;
(d)  inventory levels;
(e)  payment schedules;
(f)  methods of payment;
(g)  premises security; and
(h)  any other matters considered appropriate by the commission.
